California statutes. Water Code
(a) “Water conservation” means the reduction of the amount of water consumed or irretrievably lost in the process of satisfying beneficial uses which can be achieved either by improving the technology or the method for diverting, transporting, applying, reusing, salvaging, or recovering water, or by implementing other conservation methods. 

(b) “Efficient water management” means reasonable and economically justifiable programs to improve the delivery and use of water for agricultural purposes that will result in water conservation. 

(c) “Water supplier” means the department or other public agency that supplies water for agricultural use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 184, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10522.

A water supplier, individually or in cooperation with other public agencies or persons, may institute a water conservation or efficient water management program, including, but not limited to, all of the following components:

(a) Providing irrigation and other water use management services to persons served by the water supplier, including, but not limited to, all of the following services: 

(1) Providing information on historic and current crop water use data for crops grown in the area served by the water supplier, including evapotranspiration and leaching requirements of those crops. 

(2) Providing irrigation consulting services to monitor on-farm water use practices and to provide information to improve on-farm water management. 

(3) Monitoring salinity to obtain favorable salt balances. 

(4) Recommending more efficient techniques for preplanting irrigation of the crop root zone. 

(5) Providing evaluations of the operation and efficiency of individual on-farm irrigation systems and animal sanitation systems and similar uses, and making recommendations for improvement of those systems.

(6) Providing irrigation management improvement services during the growing season. 

(b) Making physical and structural improvements to the water supplier’s delivery system, and aiding in the improvement of on-farm systems, including, but not limited to, all of the following improvements: 

(1) Using flow measuring devices in the delivery system and providing to farmers, or assisting farmers in the use of, on-farm flow measurement devices. 

(2) Lining ditches and canals or providing pipelines in the supplier’s delivery system and helping farmers to take these actions, except where seepage is desirable for groundwater recharge or environmental purposes. 

(3) Evaluating the storage, conveyance, and drainage systems of the water supplier and the farmers served by the water supplier and the application systems of the farmers served by the water supplier to maximize efficient water management. 

(4) Assisting farmers technically and financially with installation and operation of on-farm conservation equipment if the installation and operation is economically feasible for the water supplier. 

(c) Making institutional and operational adjustments, including, but not limited to, all of the following adjustments: 

(1) Allowing changes or flexibility in the water contract year to more closely fit water-use characteristics of the crops being grown. 

(2) Establishing a pricing structure for water delivered to encourage conservation. 

(3) Maximizing flexibility, to the extent economically and otherwise feasible, in water delivery to farmers to enable them to optimize their irrigation efficiency. 

(4) Developing education programs for farmers relating to on-farm conservation. 

(5) Promoting or developing conjunctive use programs for use of groundwater and surface water. 

(6) Encouraging voluntary exchanges of water between water suppliers which have surplus water and suppliers which have a water shortage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 184, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10523.

In formulating a water conservation or efficient water management program, a water supplier may take into account the positive or negative effect of the program, or any of its parts, on other factors, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) The productivity of agricultural land served by the water supplier or other lands. 

(b) The quality of groundwater or surface water. 

(c) Fish and wildlife or other environmental values. 

(d) Recreational uses. 

(e) Surface and subsurface drainage discharge. 

(f) The salt balance. 

(g) Groundwater overdrafting. 

(h) Peak and total energy use. 

(i) The cost of water and the economics of farming. 

(j) Water supply to other users.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 184, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.2. INTEGRATED REGIONAL WATER MANAGEMENT PLANS [10530. - 10550.]



  CHAPTER 1. Short Title [10530. - 10530.]

10530.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Integrated Regional Water Management Planning Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   Effective March 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Legislative Findings and Declarations [10531. - 10531.5.]

10531.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Water is a valuable natural resource in California, and should be managed to ensure the availability of sufficient supplies to meet the state’s agricultural, domestic, industrial, and environmental needs. It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage local agencies to work cooperatively to manage their available local and imported water supplies to improve the quality, quantity, and reliability of those supplies.

(b) Local agencies can realize efficiencies by coordinating and integrating their assets and seeking mutual solutions to water management issues.

(c) The reliability of water supplies can be significantly improved by diversifying water portfolios, taking advantage of local and regional opportunities, and considering a broad variety of water management strategies as described in the California Water Plan.

(d) The implementation of this part will facilitate the development of integrated regional water management plans, thereby assisting each region of the state to improve water supply reliability, water quality, and environmental stewardship to meet current and future needs.

(e) Water management is integrally linked to public health and the health of all natural resources within our watersheds. It is the intent of the Legislature that water management strategies and projects are carried out in a way that promotes these important public values.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   Effective March 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10531.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage collaboration among mutual water companies that operate public water systems in the City of Maywood to create a public agency that can consolidate drinking water services for the people and businesses of that city.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 633, Sec. 6.   (AB 240)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Definitions [10532. - 10539.]

10532.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   Effective March 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10533.

“Basin plan” means a water quality control plan developed pursuant to Section 13240.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   Effective March 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10534.

“Integrated regional water management plan” means a comprehensive plan for a defined geographic area, the specific development, content, and adoption of which shall satisfy requirements developed pursuant to this part. At a minimum, an integrated regional water management plan describes the major water-related objectives and conflicts within a region, considers a broad variety of water management strategies, identifies the appropriate mix of water demand and supply management alternatives, water quality protections, and environmental stewardship actions to provide long-term, reliable, and high-quality water supply and protect the environment, and identifies disadvantaged communities in the region and takes the water-related needs of those communities into consideration.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   Effective March 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10535.

“Local agency” means any city, county, city and county, special district, joint powers authority, or other political subdivision of the state, a public utility as defined in Section 216 of the Public Utilities Code, or a mutual water company as defined in Section 2725 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   Effective March 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10536.

“Plan” means an integrated regional water management plan.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   Effective March 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10537.

“Regional projects or programs” means projects or programs identified in an integrated regional water management plan that accomplish any of the following:

(a) Reduce water demand through agricultural and urban water use efficiency.

(b) Increase water supplies for any beneficial use through the use of any of the following, or other, means:

(1) Groundwater storage and conjunctive water management.

(2) Desalination.

(3) Precipitation enhancement.

(4) Water recycling.

(5) Regional and local surface storage.

(6) Water-use efficiency.

(7) Stormwater management.

(c) Improve operational efficiency and water supply reliability, including conveyance facilities, system reoperation, and water transfers.

(d) Improve water quality, including drinking water treatment and distribution, groundwater and aquifer remediation, matching water quality to water use, wastewater treatment, water pollution prevention, and management of urban and agricultural runoff.

(e) Improve resource stewardship, including agricultural lands stewardship, ecosystem restoration, flood plain management, recharge area protection, urban land use management, groundwater management, water-dependent recreation, fishery restoration, including fish passage improvement, and watershed management.

(f) Improve flood management through structural and nonstructural means, or by any other means.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   Effective March 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10538.

“Regional reports or studies” means reports or studies relating to any of the matters described in subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, of Section 10537, that are identified in an integrated regional water management plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   Effective March 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10539.

“Regional water management group” means a group in which three or more local agencies, at least two of which have statutory authority over water supply or water management, as well as those other persons who may be necessary for the development and implementation of a plan that meets the requirements in Sections 10540 and 10541, participate by means of a joint powers agreement, memorandum of understanding, or other written agreement, as appropriate, that is approved by the governing bodies of those local agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   Effective March 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Integrated Regional Water Management Plans [10540. - 10543.]

10540.

(a) A regional water management group may prepare and adopt an integrated regional water management plan in accordance with this part.

(b) A regional water management group may coordinate its planning activities to address or incorporate all or part of any of the following actions of its members into its plan:

(1) Groundwater management planning pursuant to Part 2.75 (commencing with Section 10750), groundwater sustainability planning pursuant to Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720), or other specific groundwater management authority.

(2) Urban water
 management planning pursuant to Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 10610).

(3) The preparation of a water supply assessment required pursuant to Part 2.10 (commencing with Section 10910).

(4) Agricultural water management planning pursuant to Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 10800).

(5) City and county general planning pursuant to Section 65350 of the Government Code.

(6) Stormwater resource planning that is undertaken pursuant to Part 2.3 (commencing with Section 10560).

(7) Other water resource management planning, including flood protection, watershed management planning, and multipurpose program
 planning.

(c) At a minimum, all plans shall address all of the following:

(1) Protection and improvement of water supply reliability, including identification of feasible agricultural and urban water use efficiency strategies.

(2) Identification and consideration of the drinking water quality of communities within the area of the plan.

(3) Protection and improvement of water quality within the area of the plan, consistent with the relevant basin plan.

(4) Identification of any significant threats to groundwater resources from overdrafting.

(5) Protection, restoration, and improvement of stewardship of aquatic, riparian, and watershed resources within the region.

(6) Protection of groundwater resources from contamination.

(7) Identification and consideration of the water-related needs of disadvantaged communities and owners and occupants of affordable housing, including the removal and replacement of nonfunctional turf, as defined in Section 10608.12, in the area within the boundaries of the plan.

(d) This section does not obligate a local agency to fund the implementation of any project or program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 849, Sec. 2.   (AB 1572)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10541.

(a) The department shall develop project solicitation and evaluation guidelines for the application of funds made available pursuant to Section 75026 of the Public Resources Code and all other funds that are or may become available for integrated regional water management plan implementation, including a future water bond, to enable broad and diverse participation in integrated regional water management plan development and refinement.

(b) The department shall conduct two public meetings to consider public comments prior to finalizing the guidelines. The department shall publish the draft solicitation and evaluation guidelines on its Internet
 Web site at least 30 days before the public meetings. One meeting shall be conducted at a location in northern California and one meeting shall be conducted at a location in southern California. Upon adoption, the department shall transmit copies of the guidelines to the fiscal committees and the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. To the extent feasible, each state agency shall provide outreach to disadvantaged communities to promote access to and participation in those meetings.

(c) The department shall consult with the board, the California regional water quality control boards, the State Department of Public Health, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the California Bay-Delta Authority or its successor, and other state agencies with water management responsibility and authority in the development of the guidelines.

(d) The department may periodically review and update the guidelines to accommodate changes in funding sources, statutory requirements, new commonly accepted management practices, and changes in state water management policy. Any guideline changes shall be made with appropriate consultation with other state agencies and public review pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c).

(e) The guidelines shall require that integrated regional water management plans include all of the following:

(1) Consideration of all of the resource management strategies identified in the California Water Plan, as updated by department Bulletin No. 160-2005 and future updates.

(2) Consideration of objectives in the appropriate basin plan or plans and strategies to meet applicable water quality standards.

(3) Description of the major water-related objectives and conflicts within a region.

(4) To the extent possible, measurable regional objectives and criteria for developing regional project priorities.

(5) An integrated, collaborative, multibenefit approach to selection and design of projects and programs.

(6) Identification and consideration of the
 water-related needs of disadvantaged communities in the area within the boundaries of the plan.

(7) Performance measures and monitoring to demonstrate progress toward meeting regional objectives.

(8) A plan for implementation and financing of identified projects and programs.

(9) Consideration of greenhouse gas emissions of identified programs and projects.

(10) Evaluation of the adaptability to climate change of water management systems in the region.

(11) Documentation of data and technical analyses used in the development of the plan.

(12) A process to disseminate data and information related to the development and implementation of the plan.

(13) A process to coordinate water management projects and activities of participating local agencies and local stakeholders to avoid conflicts and take advantage of efficiencies.

(14) If an area within the boundaries of the plan has nitrate, arsenic, perchlorate, or hexavalent chromium contamination, the plan shall include a description of each of the following:

(A) The location and extent of that contamination in the region.

(B) The impacts caused by the contamination to communities within the region.

(C) Existing efforts being undertaken in the region to address the impacts.

(D) Any additional efforts needed to address the impacts.

(15) Any other matters identified by the department.

(f) The guidelines shall include standards for identifying a region for the purpose of developing or modifying an integrated regional water management plan. At a minimum, a region shall be a contiguous geographic area encompassing the service areas of multiple local agencies, and shall be defined to maximize
 opportunities for integration of water management activities. The department shall develop a process to approve the composition of a region for the purposes of Sections 75026, 75027, and 75028 of the Public Resources Code.

(g) The guidelines shall require that the development and implementation of an integrated regional water management plan include a public process that provides outreach and an opportunity to participate in plan development and implementation to appropriate local agencies and stakeholders, as applicable to the region, including all of the following:

(1) Wholesale and retail water purveyors, including a local agency, mutual water company, or a water corporation as defined in Section 241 of the Public Utilities Code.

(2) Wastewater agencies.

(3) Flood control agencies.

(4) Municipal and county governments and special districts.

(5) Electrical corporations, as defined in Section 218 of the Public Utilities Code.

(6) Native American tribes that have lands within the region.

(7) Self-supplied water users, including agricultural, industrial, residential, park districts, school districts, colleges and universities, and others.

(8) Environmental stewardship organizations, including watershed groups,
 fishing groups, land conservancies, and environmental groups.

(9) Community organizations, including landowner organizations, taxpayer groups, and recreational interests.

(10) Industry organizations representing agriculture, developers, and other industries appropriate to the region.

(11) State, federal, and regional agencies or universities, with specific responsibilities or knowledge within the region.

(12) Disadvantaged community members and representatives, including environmental justice organizations, neighborhood councils, and social justice organizations.

(13) Any other interested groups
 appropriate to the region.

(h) The guidelines shall require integrated regional water management plans to be developed through a collaborative process that makes public both of the following:

(1) The process by which decisions are made in consultation with the persons or entities identified in subdivision (g).

(2) The manner in which a balance of interested persons or entities representing different sectors and interests listed in subdivision (g) have been or will be engaged in the process described in this subdivision, regardless of their ability to contribute financially to the plan.

(i) The guidelines shall provide for a process for the development,
 periodic review, updating, and amending of integrated regional water management plans. The department shall establish eligibility requirements for the project funding, that provide sufficient time for the updating of plans as necessary to reflect changes in the guidelines.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 717, Sec. 1.   (AB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10543.

(a) A regional water management group proposing to prepare an integrated regional water management plan shall publish a notice of intention to prepare the plan in accordance with Section 6066 of the Government Code.

(b) For the purposes of carrying out this part, the regional water management group shall make available to the public the documentation prepared pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 10541 describing the manner in which interested parties may participate in developing the integrated regional water management plan.

(c) Upon the completion of the integrated regional water management plan, the regional water management group shall publish a notice of intention to adopt the plan in accordance with Section 6066 of the Government Code and shall adopt the plan in a public meeting of its governing board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   Effective March 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Funding for Qualified Projects and Programs [10544. - 10547.]

10544.

When selecting projects and programs pursuant to Division 24 (commencing with Section 78500), Division 26 (commencing with Section 79000), Division 26.5 (commencing with Section 79500), or pursuant to any grant funding authorized on or after January 1, 2009, for water management activities, the department, the board, the State Department of Public Health, and the California Bay-Delta Authority or its successor, as appropriate, shall include in any set of criteria used to select projects and programs for funding, a criterion that provides a preference for regional projects or programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   Effective March 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10544.5.

For grant applications that include areas that have nitrate, arsenic, perchlorate, or hexavalent chromium contamination, the regional water management group shall include in the grant application information regarding how a project or projects in the application help to address the contamination or an explanation why the application does not include that kind of project or projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 717, Sec. 2.   (AB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10545.

When selecting projects pursuant to Section 75026 of the Public Resources Code or for other funds that are or may become available for integrated regional water management plan implementation, the department shall consider for grant applications that include areas that have nitrate, arsenic, perchlorate, or hexavalent chromium contamination, whether the regional water management group has included projects that help address the impacts caused by
 nitrate, arsenic, perchlorate, or hexavalent chromium contamination, including projects that provide safe drinking water to small disadvantaged communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 717, Sec. 3.   (AB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10546.

An integrated regional water management plan prepared pursuant to this part shall be eligible for funding pursuant to Section 75026 of the Public Resources Code, and for any funding authorized on or after January 1, 2009, that is allocated specifically for implementation of integrated regional water management.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   Effective March 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10547.

This part does not prohibit the department from implementing Section 75026 of the Public Resources Code by using existing integrated regional water management guidelines in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 75026 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   Effective March 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Miscellaneous [10548. - 10550.]

10548.

This part does not affect any powers granted to a local agency by any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   Effective March 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10549.

This part does not authorize a regional water management group to define, or otherwise determine, the water rights of any person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   Effective March 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10550.

The plan or project shall not be funded pursuant to this part if it would fund activities inconsistent with applicable state and federal water quality laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   Effective March 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.3. STORMWATER RESOURCE PLANNING  [10560. - 10565.]

10560.

This part shall be known and may be cited as “The Stormwater Resource Planning Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 620, Sec. 3.   (SB 790)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10561.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) In many parts of the state stormwater and dry weather runoff are underutilized sources of surface water and groundwater supplies. Instead of being viewed as a resource, they are often seen as a problem that must be moved to the ocean as quickly as possible or as a source of contamination, contributing to a loss of usable water supplies and the pollution and impairment of rivers, lakes, streams, and coastal waters.

(b) Improved management of stormwater and dry weather runoff, including capture, treatment, and reuse by using the natural functions of soils and plants, can improve water quality, reduce localized
 flooding, and increase water supplies for beneficial uses and the environment.

(c) Most of California’s current stormwater drainage systems are designed to capture and convey water away from people and property rather than capturing that water for beneficial uses.

(d) Historical patterns of precipitation are predicted to change and an increasing amount of California’s water is predicted to fall not as snow in the mountains, but as rain in other areas of the state. This will likely have a profound and transforming effect on California’s hydrologic cycle and much of that water will no longer be captured by California’s reservoirs, many of which are located to capture snow melt.

(e) When properly designed and managed, the capture and use of stormwater and dry weather
 runoff can contribute significantly to local water supplies through onsite storage and use, or letting it infiltrate into the ground to recharge groundwater, either onsite or at regional facilities, thereby increasing available supplies of drinking water.

(f) New developments and redevelopments should be designed to be consistent with low-impact development principles to improve the retention, use, and infiltration of stormwater and dry weather runoff onsite or at regional facilities.

(g) Stormwater and dry weather runoff can be managed to achieve environmental and societal benefits such as wetland creation and restoration, riverside habitats, instream flows, and an increase in park and recreation lands, and urban green space.

(h) Stormwater and dry weather runoff management through multiobjective projects can
 achieve additional benefits, including augmenting recreation opportunities for communities, increased tree canopy, reduced urban heat island effect, and improved air quality.

(i) Proper planning and implementation is vital to ensure that the water supply and other benefits potentially available through better management of stormwater and dry weather runoff do not come at the expense of diminished water quality.

(j) The capture and use of stormwater and dry weather runoff is not only one of the most cost-effective sources of new water supplies, it is a supply that can often be provided using significantly less energy than other sources of new water supplies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 555, Sec. 1.   (SB 985)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10561.5.

Solely for the purposes of this part, and unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this part:

(a) “Dry weather runoff” means surface waterflow and waterflow in storm drains, flood control channels, or other means of runoff conveyance produced by nonstormwater resulting from irrigation, residential, commercial, and industrial activities.

(b) “Stormwater” means temporary surface water runoff and drainage generated by immediately preceding storms. This definition shall be interpreted consistent with the definition of “stormwater” in Section 122.26 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal
 Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 555, Sec. 2.   (SB 985)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10561.7.

(a) A public entity that captures stormwater from urban areas, in accordance with a stormwater resource plan, before the water reaches a natural channel shall be entitled to use the captured water to the extent that the water augments existing water
 supplies.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to do any of the following:

(1) Alter or impair any existing rights.

(2) Change existing water rights law.

(3) Interfere with, amend, or supersede any existing water rights adjudication or other legally mandated water management plan.

(4) Create a groundwater pumping right where a pumping right does not already
 exist.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 526, Sec. 1.   (AB 2594)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10562.

(a) One or more public agencies may develop a stormwater resource plan pursuant to this part.

(b) A stormwater resource plan shall:

(1) Be developed on a watershed basis.

(2) Identify and prioritize stormwater and dry weather runoff capture projects for implementation in a quantitative manner, using a metrics-based and integrated evaluation and analysis of multiple benefits to maximize water supply, water quality, flood management, environmental, and other community benefits within the watershed.

(3) Provide for multiple benefit
 project design to maximize water supply, water quality, and environmental and other community benefits.

(4) Provide for community participation in plan development and implementation.

(5) Be consistent with, and assist in, compliance with total maximum daily load (TMDL) implementation plans and applicable national pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES) permits.

(6) Be consistent with all applicable waste discharge permits.

(7) Upon development, be submitted to any applicable integrated regional water management group. Upon receipt, the integrated regional water management group shall incorporate the stormwater resource plan into its integrated regional water management plan.

(8) Prioritize the use of lands or easements in public ownership for stormwater and dry weather runoff projects.

(c) The proposed or adopted plan shall meet the standards outlined in this section. The plan need not be referred to as a “stormwater resource plan.” Existing planning documents may be utilized as a functionally equivalent plan, including, but not limited to, watershed management plans, integrated resource plans, urban water management plans, or similar plans. If a planning document does not meet the standards of this section, a collection of local and regional plans may constitute a functional equivalent, if the plans collectively meet all of the requirements of this part.

(d) An entity developing a stormwater resource plan shall identify in the plan all of the following:

(1) Opportunities to augment local water supply through groundwater recharge or storage for beneficial use of stormwater and dry weather runoff.

(2) Opportunities for source control for both pollution and stormwater and dry weather runoff volume, onsite and local infiltration, and use of stormwater and dry weather runoff.

(3) Projects to reestablish natural water drainage treatment and infiltration systems, or mimic natural system functions to the maximum extent feasible.

(4) Opportunities to develop, restore, or enhance habitat and open space through stormwater and dry weather runoff management, including wetlands, riverside habitats, parkways, and parks.

(5) Opportunities to use existing
 publicly owned lands and easements, including, but not limited to, parks, public open space, community gardens, farm and agricultural preserves, schoolsites, and government office buildings and complexes, to capture, clean, store, and use stormwater and dry weather runoff either onsite or offsite.

(6) Design criteria and best management practices to prevent stormwater and dry weather runoff pollution and increase effective stormwater and dry weather runoff management for new and upgraded infrastructure and residential, commercial, industrial, and public development. These design criteria and best management practices shall accomplish all of the following:

(A) Reduce effective impermeability within a watershed by creating permeable surfaces and directing stormwater and dry weather runoff to permeable surfaces, retention basins, cisterns, and other storage for beneficial use.

(B) Increase water storage for beneficial use through a variety of onsite storage techniques.

(C) Increase groundwater supplies through infiltration, where appropriate and feasible.

(D) Support low-impact development for new and upgraded infrastructure and development using low-impact techniques.

(7) Activities that generate or contribute to the pollution of stormwater or dry weather runoff, or that impair the effective beneficial use of stormwater or dry weather runoff.

(8) Projects and programs to ensure the effective implementation of the stormwater resource plan pursuant to this part and achieve multiple benefits. These projects and programs shall include the development of appropriate
 decision support tools and the data necessary to use the decision support tools.

(9) Ordinances or other mechanisms necessary to ensure the effective implementation of the stormwater resource plan pursuant to this part.

(e) A stormwater resource plan shall use measurable factors to identify, quantify, and prioritize potential stormwater and dry weather runoff capture projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 555, Sec. 3.   (SB 985)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10563.

(a) This part does not interfere with or prevent the exercise of authority by a public agency to carry out its programs, projects, or responsibilities.

(b) This part does not affect requirements imposed under any other law.

(c) (1) The development of a stormwater resource plan and compliance with this part in accordance with Section 10565 shall be required to receive grants for stormwater and dry weather runoff capture projects from a bond act approved by the voters after January 1, 2014.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to
 either of the following:

(A) Funds provided for the purpose of developing a stormwater resource plan.

(B) A grant for a disadvantaged community, as defined in Section 79505.5, with a population of 20,000 or less, and that is not a copermittee for a municipal separate stormwater system national pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES) permit issued to a municipality with a population greater than 20,000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 555, Sec. 4.   (SB 985)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10564.

For purposes of this part, “low-impact development” means new development or redevelopment projects that employ natural and constructed features that reduce the rate of stormwater runoff, filter out pollutants, facilitate stormwater storage onsite, infiltrate stormwater into the ground to replenish groundwater supplies, or improve the quality of receiving groundwater and surface water.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 620, Sec. 3.   (SB 790)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10565.

By July 1, 2016, the board shall establish guidance for this part that shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) Identifying types of local agencies and nongovernmental organizations that need to be consulted in developing a stormwater resource plan.

(b) Defining appropriate quantitative methods for identifying and prioritizing opportunities for stormwater and dry weather runoff capture projects.

(c) Defining the appropriate geographic scale of watersheds for stormwater resource planning.

(d) Other guidance the board
 deems appropriate to achieve the objectives of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 555, Sec. 5.   (SB 985)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.4. Rainwater Capture Act of 2012 [10570. - 10574.]

10570.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Rainwater Capture Act of 2012.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1750)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10571.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) As California has grown and developed, the amount of stormwater flowing off buildings, parking lots, roads, and other impervious surfaces into surface water streams, flood channels, and storm sewers has increased, thereby reducing the volume of water allowed to infiltrate into groundwater aquifers and increasing water and pollution flowing to the ocean and other surface waters. At the same time, recurring droughts and water shortages in California have made local water supply augmentation and water conservation efforts a priority.
